Nevada, session 83, AB299.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 201.354 is hereby amended to read as follows:
201.354 1. It is unlawful for a customer to engage in
prostitution or solicitation therefor, except in a licensed house of
prostitution. Whether or not a warrant has been issued, a peace
officer shall arrest a person if the peace officer has probable cause
to believe that the person to be arrested has violated this section.
2. Any person who violates subsection 1 by soliciting for
prostitution:
(a) A child;
(b) A peace officer who is posing as a child; or
-
*AB299_R1*

– 3 –
(c) A person who is assisting in an investigation on behalf of a
peace officer by posing as a child,
 is guilty of soliciting a child for prostitution.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a person who
violates this section:
(a) For a first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.150, and by a fine of not less than
[$400.] $800.
(b) For a second offense, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and
shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.140, and by a fine of not
less than $800.
(c) For a third or subsequent offense, is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.140,
and by a fine of not less than $1,300.
4. In addition to any other penalty imposed, the court shall
order a person who violates subsection 1 to pay a civil penalty of not
less than [$200] $600 per offense. The civil penalty must be paid to
the district attorney or city attorney of the jurisdiction in which the
violation occurred. If the civil penalty imposed pursuant to this
subsection:
(a) Is not within the person’s present ability to pay, in lieu of
paying the penalty, the court may allow the person to perform
community service for a reasonable number of hours, the value of
which would be commensurate with the civil penalty.
(b) Is not entirely within the person’s present ability to pay, in
lieu of paying the entire civil penalty, the court may allow the
person to perform community service for a reasonable number of
hours, the value of which would be commensurate with the amount
of the reduction of the civil penalty.
5. A person who violates this section by soliciting a child for
prostitution:
(a) For a first offense, is guilty of a category D felony and shall
be punished as provided in NRS 193.130, and by a fine of not more
than $5,000.
(b) For a second offense, is guilty of a category C felony and
shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(c) For a third or subsequent offense, is guilty of a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and maximum term of not
more than 6 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $15,000. The court shall not grant probation to or suspend
the sentence of a person punished pursuant to this paragraph.
6. Any civil penalty collected by a district attorney or city
attorney pursuant to subsection 4 must be deposited in the county or
city treasury, as applicable, to be used for:
-
*AB299_R1*

– 4 –
(a) The enforcement of this section; and
(b) Programs of treatment for persons who solicit prostitution
which are certified by the Division of Public and Behavioral Health
of the Department of Health and Human Services.
 Not less than 50 percent of the money deposited in the county or
city treasury, as applicable, pursuant to this subsection must be used
for the enforcement of this section.
7. If a person who violates subsection 1 is ordered pursuant to
NRS 4.373 or 5.055 to participate in a program for the treatment of
persons who solicit prostitution, upon fulfillment of the terms and
conditions of the program, the court may discharge the person and
dismiss the proceedings against the person. If the court discharges
the person and dismisses the proceedings against the person, a
nonpublic record of the discharge and dismissal must be transmitted
to and retained by the Division of Parole and Probation of the
Department of Public Safety solely for the use of the courts in
determining whether, in later proceedings, the person qualifies
under this section for participation in a program of treatment for
persons who solicit prostitution. Except as otherwise provided in
this subsection, discharge and dismissal under this subsection is
without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction for purposes of
employment, civil rights or any statute or regulation or license or
questionnaire or for any other public or private purpose, but is a
conviction for the purpose of additional penalties imposed for a
second or subsequent conviction or the setting of bail. Discharge
and dismissal restores the person discharged, in the contemplation
of the law, to the status occupied before the proceedings. The person
may not be held thereafter under any law to be guilty of perjury or
otherwise giving a false statement by reason of failure to recite or
acknowledge the proceedings in response to an inquiry made of the
person for any purpose. Discharge and dismissal under this
subsection may occur only once with respect to any person. A
professional licensing board may consider a proceeding under this
subsection in determining suitability for a license or liability to
discipline for misconduct. Such a board is entitled for those
purposes to a truthful answer from the applicant or licensee
concerning any such proceeding with respect to the applicant or
licensee.
8. Except as limited by subsection 9, if a person is discharged
and the proceedings against the person are dismissed pursuant to
subsection 7, the [court shall, without a hearing,] person may
petition the court for the sealing of all records relating to the
discharge and dismissal 2 years after the date of the dismissal. The
court may order sealed all documents, papers and exhibits in that
person’s record, minute book entries and entries on dockets, and
-
*AB299_R1*

– 5 –
other documents relating to the case in the custody of such other
agencies and officers as are named in the court’s order. The court
shall cause a copy of the order to be sent to each agency or officer
named in the order. Each such agency or officer shall notify the
court in writing of its compliance with the order.
9. A professional licensing board is entitled, for the purpose of
determining suitability for a license or liability to discipline for
misconduct, to inspect and to copy from a record sealed pursuant to
this section.
Sec. 1.2. Chapter 11 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in NRS 11.215, an action to
recover damages pursuant to section 1.6 of this act must be
commenced within 20 years after the date on which the
prostitution or solicitation for prostitution in violation of NRS
201.354 occurred.
Sec. 1.4. NRS 11.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
11.190 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 40.4639,
125B.050 and 217.007, actions other than those for the recovery of
real property, unless further limited by specific statute, may only be
commenced as follows:
1. Within 6 years:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 62B.420 and 176.275,
an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of the United
States, or of any state or territory within the United States, or the
renewal thereof.
(b) An action upon a contract, obligation or liability founded
upon an instrument in writing, except those mentioned in the
preceding sections of this chapter.
2. Within 4 years:
(a) An action on an open account for goods, wares and
merchandise sold and delivered.
(b) An action for any article charged on an account in a store.
(c) An action upon a contract, obligation or liability not founded
upon an instrument in writing.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 11.245, an action
against a person alleged to have committed a deceptive trade
practice in violation of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive, but
the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue when the aggrieved
party discovers, or by the exercise of due diligence should have
discovered, the facts constituting the deceptive trade practice.
3. Within 3 years:
(a) An action upon a liability created by statute, other than a
penalty or forfeiture.
-
*AB299_R1*

– 6 –
(b) An action for waste or trespass of real property, but when the
waste or trespass is committed by means of underground works
upon any mining claim, the cause of action shall be deemed to
accrue upon the discovery by the aggrieved party of the facts
constituting the waste or trespass.
(c) An action for taking, detaining or injuring personal property,
including actions for specific recovery thereof, but in all cases
where the subject of the action is a domestic animal usually included
in the term “livestock,” which has a recorded mark or brand upon it
at the time of its loss, and which strays or is stolen from the true
owner without the owner’s fault, the statute does not begin to run
against an action for the recovery of the animal until the owner has
actual knowledge of such facts as would put a reasonable person
upon inquiry as to the possession thereof by the defendant.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 112.230 and 166.170,
an action for relief on the ground of fraud or mistake, but the cause
of action in such a case shall be deemed to accrue upon the
discovery by the aggrieved party of the facts constituting the fraud
or mistake.
(e) An action pursuant to NRS 40.750 for damages sustained by
a financial institution or other lender because of its reliance on
certain fraudulent conduct of a borrower, but the cause of action in
such a case shall be deemed to accrue upon the discovery by the
financial institution or other lender of the facts constituting the
concealment or false statement.
(f) An action pursuant to NRS 41.1335, but the cause of action
shall be deemed to accrue upon the discovery by the aggrieved party
of the facts constituting fertility fraud or of any medical or genetic
disorder which results from the human reproductive material
implanted in, used on or provided to a patient in violation of NRS
200.975, whichever occurs later.
4. Within 2 years:
(a) An action against a sheriff, coroner or constable upon
liability incurred by acting in his or her official capacity and in
virtue of his or her office, or by the omission of an official duty,
including the nonpayment of money collected upon an execution.
(b) An action upon a statute for a penalty or forfeiture, where the
action is given to a person or the State, or both, except when the
statute imposing it prescribes a different limitation.
(c) An action for libel, slander, assault, battery, false
imprisonment or seduction.
(d) An action against a sheriff or other officer for the escape of a
prisoner arrested or imprisoned on civil process.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 11.215 or 11.217, or
section 1.2 of this act, an action to recover damages for injuries to a
-
*AB299_R1*

– 7 –
person or for the death of a person caused by the wrongful act or
neglect of another. The provisions of this paragraph relating to an
action to recover damages for injuries to a person apply only to
causes of action which accrue after March 20, 1951.
(f) An action to recover damages under NRS 41.740.
5. Within 1 year:
(a) An action against an officer, or officer de facto to recover
goods, wares, merchandise or other property seized by the officer in
his or her official capacity, as tax collector, or to recover the price or
value of goods, wares, merchandise or other personal property so
seized, or for damages for the seizure, detention or sale of, or injury
to, goods, wares, merchandise or other personal property seized, or
for damages done to any person or property in making the seizure.
(b) An action against an officer, or officer de facto for money
paid to the officer under protest, or seized by the officer in his or her
official capacity, as a collector of taxes, and which, it is claimed,
ought to be refunded.
Sec. 1.6. Chapter 41 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
In addition to any other remedy provided by law, a person who
has suffered an injury as the proximate result of a violation of
NRS 201.354 may bring an action for the recovery of the person’s
actual damages and any punitive damages which the facts may
warrant against the person convicted of the offense.
Sec. 1.8. The amendatory provisions of sections 1.2, 1.4 and
1.6 of this act apply to a cause of action that accrues on or after
July 1, 2025.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB299_R1*